Wisconsin, session 2025, AB87.
do enact as follows:AB87,1Section 1. 304.078 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:304.078 (3) If a person is disqualified from voting under s. 6.03 (1) (b), his or her right to vote is restored when he or she completes the term of imprisonment or probation for the crime that led to the disqualification and has paid all fines, costs, fees, surcharges, and restitution, and has completed any court-ordered community service, imposed in connection with the crime. The department or, if the person is sentenced to a county jail or house of correction, the jailer the elections commission shall inform the person in writing at the time his or her right to vote is restored under this subsection.AB87,2Section 2. 973.20 (10) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:973.20 (10) (a) The If the defendant violated s. 940.302 (2) or 948.051, the court shall require that restitution be paid immediately and, if the defendant fails, the court shall issue an execution against the property of the defendant in the same mode as upon a judgment entered in the circuit court in civil actions. In other cases, the court may require that restitution be paid immediately, within a specified period, or in specified installments. If the defendant is placed on probation or sentenced to imprisonment, the end of a specified period shall not be later than the end of any period of probation, extended supervision, or parole. If the defendant is sentenced to the intensive sanctions program, the end of a specified period shall not be later than the end of the sentence under s. 973.032 (3) (a). Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab87 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab87 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB87 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB87 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB87: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting